Utah statutes.
61-2f-104.   List of licensees, registrants, and certificate holders to be available.

(1)  Upon request, the division shall make available a list of the names and addresses of the persons licensed, registered, or certified by it under this chapter either directly or through a third party.

(2)  A person who requests a list under Subsection (1) shall pay the costs incurred by the division to make the list available.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

